Washington statutes.
RCW 37.12.130

Quileute, Chehalis, Swinomish, and Colville Indian reservations—Retrocession of criminal jurisdiction—Savings.

An action or proceeding which has been filed with any court or agency of the state or local government preceding the effective date of retrocession of jurisdiction under RCW 37.12.100 through 37.12.140 shall not abate by reason of the retrocession or determination of jurisdiction.

[ 1986 c 267 s 6.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 267: See note following RCW 37.12.100.